Utah statutes.
36-12-10.   Right of members to attend meetings -- Voting -- Subject to open and public meeting requirements.

Any member of the Legislature has the right to attend any meeting of the House, Senate, and Legislative Management Committees, the subcommittees of the Legislative Management Committee, or any interim committee and to present views on any subject under consideration, but no legislator has the right to vote on any decision of a committee of which he is not a member.  All meetings of these committees shall be subject to Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act.



Amended by Chapter 14, 2006 General Session

